test/src/morphology/V-suvaija_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - suvaija: # Verb 'to love / rakastaa' - full paradigm
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: suvaičen
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: suvaičet
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: suvaiččou
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: suvaičemmo
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: suvaičetto
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: suvaijah
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: suvaiče

     suvaija+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: suvaičin
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: suvaičit
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: suvaičči
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: suvaičimmo
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: suvaičitto
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: suvaittih
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: suvainnuh
     suvaija+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3: suvaittu

     suvaija+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:  suvaiččizin
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:  suvaiččizit
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:  suvaiččis
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:  suvaiččizimmo
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:  suvaiččizitto
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:  suvaittas
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: suvaiččis
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl3:  suvaittas

     suvaija+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg1:  suvainnuzin
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg2:  suvainnuzit
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg3:  suvainnus
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl1:  suvainnuzimmo
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl2:  suvainnuzitto
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl3:  suvaitannus
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg: suvainnus
     suvaija+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3:  suvaitannus

     suvaija+V+Pot+ScSg1:  suvainnen
     suvaija+V+Pot+ScSg2:  suvainnet
     suvaija+V+Pot+ScSg3:  suvainnou
     suvaija+V+Pot+ScPl1:  suvainnemmo
     suvaija+V+Pot+ScPl2:  suvainnetto
     suvaija+V+Pot+ScPl3:  suvaitanneh
     suvaija+V+Pot+ConNeg: suvainne
     suvaija+V+Pot+ConNeg+ScPl3:  suvaitanne

     suvaija+V+Imprt+ScSg2:  suvaiče
     suvaija+V+Imprt+ScSg3:  suvaikkah
     suvaija+V+Imprt+ScPl1:  suvaikkuammo
     suvaija+V+Imprt+ScPl2: [suvaikkua, suvaikkuatto]
     suvaija+V+Imprt+ScPl3:  suvaittahes
     suvaija+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg2: suvaiče
     suvaija+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg3: suvaikkah
     suvaija+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl1: suvaikkuammo
     suvaija+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl2: suvaikkua
     suvaija+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl3: suvaittahes


     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: suvaiččii
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: suvaiččijan
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Acc: [suvaiččii, suvaiččijan]
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Par: suvaiččijua
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ess: suvaiččijannu
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Tra: suvaiččijakse
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ine: suvaiččijas
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ela: [suvaiččijaspäi, suvaiččijas]
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: suvaiččijah
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ade: suvaiččijal
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Abl: [suvaiččijalpäi, suvaiččijal]
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+All: suvaiččijale
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Abe: suvaiččijattah
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Com: suvaiččijanke
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Prl: suvaiččijači
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: suvaiččijat
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: suvaiččijoin
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Acc: suvaiččijat
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Par: suvaiččijoi
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ess: suvaiččijoinnu
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Tra: suvaiččijoikse
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ine: suvaiččijois
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ela: [suvaiččijoispäi, suvaiččijois]
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: suvaiččijoih
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ade: suvaiččijoil
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Abl: [suvaiččijoilpäi, suvaiččijoil]
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+All: suvaiččijoile
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Abe: suvaiččijoittah
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Com: suvaiččijoinke
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Prl: suvaiččijoiči
     suvaija+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ins: suvaiččijoin


     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: suvaittavu
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: suvaittavan
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Acc: [suvaittavu, suvaittavan]
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Par: suvaittavua
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ess: suvaittavannu
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Tra: suvaittavakse
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ine: suvaittavas
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ela: [suvaittavaspäi, suvaittavas]
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: suvaittavah
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ade: suvaittaval
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Abl: [suvaittavalpäi, suvaittaval]
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+All: suvaittavale
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Abe: suvaittavattah
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Com: suvaittavanke
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Prl: suvaittavači

     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: suvaittavat
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: suvaittavien
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Acc: suvaittavat
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Par: suvaittavii
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ess: suvaittavinnu
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Tra: suvaittavikse
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ine: suvaittavis
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ela: [suvaittavispäi, suvaittavis]
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: suvaittavih
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ade: suvaittavil
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Abl: [suvaittavilpäi, suvaittavil]
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+All: suvaittavile
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Abe: suvaittavittah
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Com: suvaittavienke
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Prl: suvaittaviči
     suvaija+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ins: suvaittavin

     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Nom: suvainnuh
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Gen: suvainnuon
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Acc: [suvainnuh, suvainnuon]
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Par: suvainnuttu
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ess: suvainnuonnu
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Tra: suvainnuokse
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ine: suvainnuos
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ela: [suvainnuospäi, suvainnuos]
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ill: suvainnuoh
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ade: suvainnuol
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Abl: [suvainnuolpäi, suvainnuol]
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+All: suvainnuole
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Abe: suvainnuottah
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Com: suvainnuonke
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Prl: suvainnuoči

     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Nom: suvainnuot
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Gen: suvainnuzien
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Acc: suvainnuot
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Par: suvainnuzii
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ess: suvainnuzinnu
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Tra: suvainnuzikse
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ine: suvainnuzis
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ela: [suvainnuzispäi, suvainnuzis]
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ill: suvainnuzih
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ade: suvainnuzil
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Abl: [suvainnuzilpäi, suvainnuzil]
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+All: suvainnuzile
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Abe: suvainnuzittah
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Com: suvainnuzienke
     suvaija+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Prl: suvainnuziči
